Massachusetts, session 194th, H604.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There shall be included in the 2025-2026 school year curriculum and all
subsequent curriculums learning, discussion, and exploration into the history of APIDA
individuals, and their history relating to the United States. This instruction of both local and
national history will serve to give all students a more comprehensive and accurate narrative of
the US population as a whole. This instruction may be modified to fit the needs of an individual
community but must fully comply with the criteria detailed in Section 4.
SECTION 2. There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a
separate fund to be known as the APIDA History Education Trust Fund for the purpose of
educating elementary, middle, and high school students on APIDA history. The commissioner of
elementary and secondary education shall administer the fund to assist in promoting the teaching
of 4

of human rights issues in all public schools and school districts. There shall be credited to the
fund: (i) funds from public and private sources such as gifts, grants and donations to further
APIDA history education; (ii) revenue from fines imposed for a hate crime or civil rights
violation pursuant to section 37 or section 39 of chapter 265; and (iv) interest earned on money
in the fund.
SECTION 3. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 99. (a) The Massachusetts Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
will update the state History and Social Science Curriculum Frameworks for elementary, middle,
and high school students to include the history of Asian Pacific Islander Desi Americans.
(b) APIDA history is the history of Asian Pacific Islander Desi Americans. The term
encompasses a diverse group of identities, and refers to a US citizen or resident of Asian birth or
descent. Updated curricula will include the political, economic, cultural, and social influence of
Asian Pacific Islander Desi Americans as well as their individual contributions to science and
technology, culture and the arts, and professions such as business, law, medicine, education,
politics, and economics.
(c) Every school district shall, for the purpose of educating elementary, middle, and high
school students, provide instruction on the history of Asian Pacific Islander Desi Americans as
aligned to, but not limited to, the content standards articulated in the history and social science
curriculum frameworks adopted by the Massachusetts Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education.
of 4

(d) Instruction on APIDA history shall be consistent within the History and Social
Science Curriculum Framework to: (i) promote the teaching of diverse perspectives in all
publicly funded schools and school districts, with particular attention to the study of the
achievements of APIDA people; (ii) address how the history and patterns of prejudice and racism
have impacted APIDA people; and (iii) reject the targeting of a APIDA populations and other
forms of prejudice that can lead to systemic racism in an effort to be more anti-racist.
(e) The Massachusetts Association of School Superintendents and the Department of
Elementary and Secondary Education shall assist schools in providing instruction on the history
of APIDA people by facilitating access to high-quality curricular materials.
(f) The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education will provide training for
educators in the teaching of APIDA history in person or through the use of synchronous audio,
video, electronic media, or other telecommunications technology.
(g) Nothing in this section shall require a school district to require APIDA history
instruction in every year of elementary, middle school, and high school; provided, however, that
APIDA history education and instruction shall be utilized during appropriate times in
elementary, middle, and high school curricula, as determined by the local school district and in
conjunction with state curricular standards.
SECTION 4. The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education shall annually
assess whether each district is meeting the updated curricular standards with APIDA history set
by the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education; if they assess that they are not
already meeting the curricular standards, each district superintendent shall be expected to work
of 4

with their history and social science departments to improve their curriculum to meet the
standards. To do so, they may use funds provided by the APIDA History Education Trust Fund.
SECTION 5. Sections 1, 2, and 4 shall take effect for the school year beginning after July
1, 2025.
of 4